Tennessee statutes. Title 18 Clerks Of Courts
Chapter 3

Supreme Court Clerks

18-3-101. Appointment — Tenure.

The clerk of the supreme court shall be appointed by the judges of the supreme court and shall hold office for a period of six (6) years. The clerk of the supreme court shall be located at Nashville.

Three (3) chief deputy clerks of the supreme court, one (1) each for the eastern, middle and western grand divisions, shall be appointed by the clerk of the supreme court, subject to the approval of the supreme court, to supervise and coordinate the business of the supreme court and intermediate appellate courts in their respective grand divisions. The chief deputy clerk for the eastern grand division shall be located at Knoxville. The chief deputy clerk for the middle grand division shall be located at Nashville. The chief deputy clerk for the western grand division shall be located at Jackson.

Code 1858, § 321 (deriv. Const. 1834, art. 6, § 13); Acts 1870, ch. 24, § 4; Shan., § 397; Code 1932, § 647; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-301; Acts 1993, ch. 70, § 8.

Cross-References. Clerks of supreme court to be clerks of court of appeals, §16-4-106.

Clerks of supreme court to be clerks of court of criminal appeals, §16-5-109.

Compensation of appellate clerks, §8-23-105.

Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

Comparative Legislation. Supreme court clerks:

Ala. Code §12-2-90 et seq.

Ark. Code §16-20-201 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §15-2-40 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 21A.030.

Miss. Code Ann. §9-3-13 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 483-215 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 7A-11.

Va. Code § 17-33 et seq.

Collateral References. Clerks of Courts
3.

18-3-102. Duties.

The clerk of the supreme court, in addition to the duties prescribed by chapters 1 and 2 of this title, is required to:

Preserve the written opinions of the judges as other records of the clerk of the supreme court's office, subject to the inspection of all persons wishing to examine them, and to furnish certified copies of the written opinions, on demand, to any person applying and paying the lawful fees;

Deliver to the attorney general and reporter the original opinions of the court within ten (10) days after the decision;

Issue to the inferior courts, within sixty (60) days, and before the next term of the inferior court after the adjournment of the supreme court, certified copies of the opinions and judgments or decrees in all cases reversed and remanded;

Pay over costs incurred in inferior courts, as provided in § 20-12-140;

Note on the execution docket executions not returned at the time specified in the execution; and

Perform such other duties as are or may be required of the clerk of the supreme court by law.

Code 1858, § 4088 (deriv. Acts 1823, ch. 54, § 5; 1829, ch. 60, § 1); Acts 1881, ch. 4, § 4; Shan., § 5902; mod. Code 1932, § 10102; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-302.

Cross-References. Cross index as to all parties in minute books and execution dockets, §10-7-209.

Entry of decrees in chancery court records, §21-1-811.

Fees for services, title 8, ch. 21, parts 4 and 5.

Opinions of supreme court, enrollment and delivery to attorney general, §8-6-201.

Report and payment of revenues, §§9-2-108 —9-2-122.

Services for court of appeals, §16-4-106.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

Collateral References. Clerks of Courts
1.

18-3-103 — 18-3-108. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§18-3-103 —18-3-108 (Code 1858, § 4090 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 145, § 2); Shannon, § 5903; Code 1932, § 10103; Acts 1951, ch. 218, §§ 1-5 (Williams, §§ 10654.1-10654.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 18-304 — 18-308), concerning payment for supreme court record books and the duties of supreme court clerks with respect to disposition of transcripts, dockets and other documents, were repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 70, § 9.

18-3-109. Recess appointments.

If the office of clerk of the supreme court becomes vacant during the recess of the court, the chief justice of the supreme court may make a temporary appointment to fill it until the judges of the supreme court meet and make a permanent appointment.

Code 1858, § 322 (deriv. Acts 1823, ch. 14, § 1); Shan., § 398; Code 1932, § 648; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-309; Acts 1993, ch. 70, § 11.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

18-3-110. Removal.

The clerk of the supreme court may be removed from office by the court for malfeasance, incompetency or neglect of duty.

The reasons for removal shall be entered on the minutes of the court.

Code 1858, §§ 4091, 4092; Shan., §§ 5904, 5905; Code 1932, §§ 10104, 10105; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-310; Acts 1993, ch. 70, § 12.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

Collateral References. Clerks of Courts
8.

18-3-111. Disposition of old court documents — Record retention plan.

The clerk of the supreme court shall dispose of or preserve old dockets, old transcripts, old records or any other books, documents, papers, etc., as directed by the chief justice of the supreme court in accordance with the records retention plan promulgated by the supreme court.

Acts 1993, ch. 70, § 10.